Tennessee, session 114, SB1571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-30-205(a), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
This subsection (a) does not apply if the data is collected as part of a clinical trial or
other biomedical research study conducted in accordance with 28 CFR Part 202.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1571
009793
- 1 -